Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-909
Labor organization; suits against; designation.

In any action brought under sections 48-901 to 48-912, any labor organization may be sued in its own name and without identification of any of the persons who are its members.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 9, p. 810;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 73.

For other provisions for actions against labor organizations, see sections 25-313 and 25-530.08.